Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2170.01
Who may compel partition.

Any joint owner of any real estate or of any interest therein or of any mineral, coal, petroleum, or gas rights, whether held in fee or by lease or otherwise, may compel a partition thereof in the manner provided in sections 25-2170 to 25-21,111.

Laws 1951, c. 72, § 1(1), p. 228.

A tenant cannot seek partition of a landlord's property. Dreesen Enters. v. Dreesen, 308 Neb. 433, 954 N.W.2d 874 (2021).

Partition, if well founded, is an absolute right, and a conservator need not obtain a license to so act. Cofer v. Perkins, 199 Neb. 327, 258 N.W.2d 807 (1977).

A life tenant who owns no other interest in the property cannot compel partition over objection of remaindermen. Dixon v. Dixon, 189 Neb. 212, 202 N.W.2d 180 (1972).

Action to partition mineral interests in lands was authorized by this section. Phillips v. Phillips, 170 Neb. 733, 104 N.W.2d 52 (1960).

Lessee for term of years holding an entire interest in lease has no leasehold to partition. Hartman v. Drake, 166 Neb. 87, 87 N.W.2d 895 (1958).